Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201879-4,129
State committee; duties; school board; appointments; terms; duties.

(1) Within thirty days after the classification of the reorganized school districts by the county clerk under section 79-4,128, the state committee shall appoint from among the legal voters of each new school district created the number of school board members specified in the plan of reorganization. A reorganized school district shall be formed and organized and shall have a school board not later than April 1 following the last legal action, as prescribed in section 79-4,128, necessary to effect the changes in boundaries as set forth in the plan of reorganization, although the physical reorganization of such reorganized school district shall take effect July 1 following the classification of the reorganized school districts under section 79-4,128. The first board shall be appointed on an at-large basis, and all boards shall be elected at large until such time as election districts are established as provided in section 32-554.

(2) In appointing the first school board of a Class III school district, the terms of approximately one-half of the members shall expire on the first Thursday after the first Tuesday in January after the first even-numbered year following their appointment and the terms of the remaining members shall expire on the first Thursday after the first Tuesday in January after the second even-numbered year following their appointment. Thereafter all Class III district school boards shall be elected to terms of four years.

(3) In appointing the first school board of a Class IV school district, the members shall be appointed so that the terms of three members shall expire on the third Monday in May of the first odd-numbered year following their appointment and the terms of four members shall expire on the third Monday in May of the second odd-numbered year following their appointment. Thereafter all Class IV district school boards shall be elected to terms of four years.

(4) In appointing the first school board of a Class V school district after a reorganization under this section with a nine-member board serving terms of four years, the terms of the members shall expire as provided in section 32-545. All Class V district school boards shall be elected to terms of four years.

(5) The school boards appointed under this section shall proceed at once to organize in the manner prescribed by law.

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 40;

Laws 2013, LB125, § 5;

Laws 2014, LB946, § 39;

Laws 2018, LB377, § 30.
January 1, 2019